Ohio, session 136, HB176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 1357.01, 1357.02, 1357.03, 1357.04, 1357.05, 1357.06, 1357.07, 1357.08, 1357.09, 1357.10, 1357.11, and 1357.12 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 1357.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Advisory committee" means the universal regulatory sandbox program advisory committee established under section 1357.03 of the Revised Code. (B) "Applicable agency" means a department or agency of the state that by law regulates a business activity and persons engaged in such business activity, including the issuance of licenses or other types of authorization, which the regulatory relief division determines would otherwise regulate a sandbox participant. (C) "Business day" means any day of the week, excluding Saturday, Sunday, and a legal holiday, as defined in section 1.14 of the Revised Code. (D) "Common sense initiative office" means the office established by the governor under section 107.61 of the Revised Code. (E) "Consumer" means a person that purchases or otherwise enters into a transaction or agreement to receive an offering pursuant to a demonstration by a sandbox participant. (F) "Demonstrate" or "demonstration" means to temporarily provide an offering in accordance with the provisions of the universal regulatory sandbox program described in this chapter. (G) "Innovation" means the use or incorporation of a new idea, a new or emerging technology, or a new use of existing technology to address a problem, provide a benefit, or otherwise offer a product, production method, or service. (H) "Innovative offering" means an offering that includes an innovation. (I)(1) "Product" means a commercially distributed good that is all of the following: (a) Tangible personal property; (b) The result of a production process; (c) Passed through the distribution channel before consumption. (2) "Product" does not include either of the following: (a) Beer or wine, as defined in section 4301.01 of the Revised Code; (b) Motor vehicles, as defined in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. (J) "Production" means the method or process of creating or obtaining a good, which may include assembling, breeding, capturing, collecting, extracting, fabricating, farming, fishing, gathering, growing, harvesting, hunting, manufacturing, mining, processing, raising, or trapping a good. (K) "Sandbox participant" means a person whose application to participate in the universal regulatory sandbox is approved in accordance with this chapter. (L) "Service" means any commercial activity, duty, or labor performed for another person, except for either of the following: (1) The activities regulated by Title XLIII of the Revised Code to the extent that those activities pertain to the distribution or sale of beer or wine; (2) The activities regulated by Chapter 4517. of the Revised Code. Sec. 1357.02. (A) The common sense initiative office shall establish a universal regulatory sandbox program in consultation with applicable agencies to enable a person to obtain limited access to the market in this state to test products or services without obtaining any other license or authorization that otherwise would be required. (B) The governor shall establish a regulatory relief division within the common sense initiative office for the purposes of administering this chapter and acting as a liaison between private businesses and applicable agencies to identify state laws or regulations that could potentially be waived or suspended under the universal regulatory sandbox program. (C) The regulatory relief division may do all of the following: (1) Identify state laws and regulations that unnecessarily inhibit the creation and success of new companies or industries in this state and provide recommendations to the governor and the general assembly on modifying such state laws and regulations; (2) Create a framework for analyzing the risk level to the health, safety, and financial well-being of consumers as a result of permanently removing or temporarily waiving laws and regulations that inhibit the creation or success of new and existing companies or industries in this state; (3) Propose potential reciprocity agreements between states that use or are proposing to use similar universal regulatory sandbox programs as described in this chapter or Chapter 1355. of the Revised Code; (4) Adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code as necessary to do either of the following: (a) Administering the universal regulatory sandbox program, including the application process and the reporting requirements of sandbox participants; (b) Cooperating and consulting with the superintendent of financial institutions respecting the regulatory sandbox program authorized by Chapter 1355. of the Revised Code. Sec. 1357.03. (A) The universal regulatory sandbox program advisory committee is established within the common sense initiative office. The committee shall advise and make recommendations to the regulatory relief division as described in this chapter. (B) The committee shall consist of the following members: (1) Six members who represent business interests from a variety of industry clusters, appointed by the governor; (2) Three members who represent state agencies that regulate businesses, appointed by the governor; (3) One member of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate; (4) One member of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. (C)(1) Members of the committee shall be appointed not later than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Members of the committee serve at the pleasure of the member's appointing authority. Any vacancy in the membership of the committee shall be filled within sixty days after the vacancy occurs in the same manner as the original appointment. (2) Of the initial appointments made by the governor to the committee: (a) Three of the members described in division (B)(1) of this section and two of the members described in division (B)(2) of this section shall serve for a term ending the first day of the second calendar year that begins after the effective date of this section; (b) Three of the members described in division (B)(1) of this section and one of the members described in division (B)(2) of this section shall serve for a term ending the first day of the fourth calendar year that begins after the effective date of this section. (3) After the initial appointments, terms for all members appointed by the governor shall be four years, with each term ending on the same day of the same month as did the term it succeeds. (4) Legislative members of the committee shall serve terms of two years or for the remainder of the member's legislative term, whichever is less. (D) Members of the committee shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties, within the limits of funds available to the committee for such purposes. (E) The governor shall select a chairperson for the committee on an annual basis. The committee shall meet at the call of the chairperson. The initial meeting shall not be later than thirty days after the last member is appointed. A majority of the members of the committee constitutes a quorum for the transaction of the business of the committee. (F) The staff of the regulatory relief division shall provide technical and administrative support as needed by the committee. (G) The committee is not a public body for the purposes of section 121.22 of the Revised Code. Sec. 1357.04. On or before October 1 of the first year that begins after the effective date of this section, and annually thereafter, the common sense initiative office shall submit a written report on the activities of the regulatory relief division to the general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. The report shall include all of the following: (A) Information regarding each participant in the universal regulatory sandbox program, including which industry each participant represents and the anticipated or actual cost savings that each participant experiences; (B) Recommended changes to laws or regulations that the regulatory relief division determines unnecessarily inhibit the creation and success of new companies or industries; (C) Information on the universal regulatory sandbox program's impact on consumer outcomes; (D) Recommended changes to the universal regulatory sandbox program or the regulatory relief division. Sec. 1357.05. (A) A person that seeks to participate in the universal regulatory sandbox program shall apply to the regulatory relief division in a form and manner prescribed by the division. The application shall, at minimum, include all of the following: (1) Confirmation that the applicant is subject to the jurisdiction of the common sense initiative office, which may be demonstrated through incorporation, residency, an agreement with the office by which the applicant agrees to be subject to the laws and courts of this state relating to any action arising out of the applicant's demonstration of a product or service in the universal regulatory sandbox, or otherwise; (2) Confirmation that the applicant has established a physical or virtual location in the state, from which the demonstration of an innovative offering will be developed and performed and where all required records, documents, and data will be maintained; (3) Relevant personal and contact information for the applicant, including legal names, addresses, telephone numbers, electronic mail addresses, web site addresses, and other information that may be required by the regulatory relief division; (4) Disclosure of criminal convictions, if any, of the applicant and other participating personnel; (5) A description of the innovative offering to be demonstrated, including statements regarding all of the following: (a) How the offering is subject to licensing, legal prohibition, or other authorization requirements outside of the universal regulatory sandbox; (b) Each law or regulation that the applicant seeks to have waived or suspended while participating in the universal regulatory sandbox program; (c) How the offering would benefit consumers; (d) How the offering is different from other offerings available in this state; (e) What risks might exist for consumers that use or purchase the offering; (f) How participating in the regulatory sandbox would enable a successful demonstration of the offering; (g) A description of the proposed demonstration plan, including estimated time periods for beginning and ending the demonstration; (h) Recognition that the applicant will be subject to all laws and regulations pertaining to the applicant's offering after conclusion of the demonstration; (i) How the applicant will end the demonstration and protect consumers if the demonstration fails. (6) A list of the state agencies that regulate the applicant's business; (7) Other information that may be required by the regulatory relief division. (B) The regulatory relief division shall, upon request, consult with persons interested in participating in the universal regulatory sandbox program and assist such persons in preparing an application, including by helping to identify state agencies that regulate the person's business and laws or regulations that could have an adverse impact on the success of that business and which the person may seek to have waived or suspended while participating in the universal regulatory sandbox program. (C) The governor may require an application fee to offset the costs of the regulatory relief division and the common sense initiative office in administering the universal regulatory sandbox program. All fees collected under this section shall be deposited to the universal regulatory sandbox program fund, which is created in the state treasury, and used for the purposes of this chapter. (D) An applicant shall file a separate application for each innovative offering that the applicant seeks to demonstrate. (E) After an application is filed, the regulatory relief division shall do all of the following: (1) Keep confidential the contents of the application and any related information provided by the applicant; (2) Consult with each applicable government agency that regulates the applicant's business regarding the application and whether more information is needed from the applicant; (3) Seek any additional information from the applicant that the regulatory relief division determines is necessary. (F) Not later than five business days after the date a complete application is received by the regulatory relief division, the division shall do both of the following: (1) Review the application and refer it to each applicable state agency that regulates the applicant's business; (2) Provide the applicant with an acknowledgment of receipt of the application and the identity and contact information for each state agency to which the application has been referred for review. (G) Applications received under this section are not public records for the purposes of Chapter 149. of the Revised Code. Sec. 1357.06. (A)(1) Subject to division (A)(2) of this section, not later than thirty business days after the date on which an applicable agency receives a complete application under section 1357.05 of the Revised Code for review, the applicable agency shall provide a written report to the regulatory relief division of the applicable agency's findings. The report shall include both of the following: (a) A description of any identifiable, likely, and significant harm to the health, safety, or financial well-being of consumers that the law or regulation the applicant seeks to waive or suspend protects against; (b) A recommendation to the regulatory relief division that the applicant either be admitted or denied entrance into the universal regulatory sandbox. (2) The applicable agency may extend the deadline for delivering the written report required by division (A)(1) of this section by an additional five business days by providing notice of the extension to the regulatory relief division. The applicable agency shall not extend the deadline more than once for each application. (3) If the applicable agency recommends an applicant under this section be denied entrance into the universal regulatory sandbox, the written report shall include a description of the reasons for the recommendation, including why a temporary waiver or suspension of the relevant laws or regulations would potentially significantly harm the health, safety, or financial well-being of consumers or the public, or create unreasonable expenses for the taxpayers of this state, and the likelihood of such harm or expenses. (4) If the applicable agency determines that the consumer's or public's health, safety, or financial well-being can be protected through less restrictive means than the existing relevant laws or regulations, then the applicable agency shall provide a recommendation of how that may be achieved. (5) If an applicable agency fails to deliver a written report as required by this section, the regulatory relief division shall proceed as though the applicable agency does not object to the temporary waiver or suspension of the relevant laws or regulations for an applicant seeking to participate in the universal regulatory sandbox. (B) The regulatory relief division shall immediately reject an application if any of the following apply: (1) An applicable agency determines, in the agency's sole discretion, that the applicant's offering fails to comply with standards or specifications required by federal law or regulations; (2) An applicable agency timely recommends that the applicant be denied entrance to the universal regulatory sandbox in the agency's written report under division (A) of this section and provides the applicant with the reasons for that determination in accordance with that division; (3) The regulatory relief division determines that the applicant is better suited for the regulatory sandbox program authorized by Chapter 1355. of the Revised Code; (4) The applicant or any person who seeks to participate with the applicant in demonstrating an offering has been convicted, entered a plea of nolo contendere, or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere held in abeyance, for any crime involving significant theft, fraud, or dishonesty; (5) The applicant's offering has previously been demonstrated in the universal regulatory sandbox. (C)(1) The regulatory relief division shall provide all applications received under section 1357.05 of the Revised Code and written reports received under this section, other than those rejected under division (B) of this section, to the universal regulatory sandbox program advisory committee. (2) The universal regulatory sandbox program advisory committee shall meet to review an application and any corresponding reports not less than thirty days, and not more than one hundred twenty days, after receiving the application from the regulatory relief division under division (C)(1) of this section. (3) Subject to divisions (C)(2) and (4) of this section, the universal regulatory sandbox program advisory committee shall meet not less than one time per calendar quarter. (4) The committee may cancel a meeting otherwise required by division (C)(3) of this section if no applications are available for review. (5) After reviewing an application and the corresponding reports of applicable agencies, the committee shall provide the governor and the common sense initiative office the committee's recommendation that the applicant either be admitted or denied entrance into the universal regulatory sandbox. (D) The universal regulatory sandbox program advisory committee shall consider all of the following in determining whether to recommend that an applicant be admitted to the universal regulatory sandbox: (1) Whether the applicable agency has previously issued a license or other authorization to the applicant; (2) Whether the applicable agency has previously investigated, sanctioned, or pursued legal action against the applicant; (3) Whether a competitor to the applicant is or has been a universal regulatory sandbox participant; (4) Whether the applicant's plan adequately protects consumers from potential harm; (5) The risk of harm to consumers as compared to the potential benefits of the applicant's participation in the universal regulatory sandbox. (E)(1) The regulatory relief division, the common sense initiative office, or the governor may deny any application submitted under this chapter for any reason, including if the division, office, or governor determines that the preponderance of evidence demonstrates that suspending or waiving enforcement of a law or regulation would cause a significant risk of harm to consumers or residents of the state. (2) If the division, office, or governor denies an application under division (E)(1) or (B) of this section, the division shall provide to the applicant a written description of the reasons for not allowing the applicant to participate in the universal regulatory sandbox. (3) The division's, office's, or governor's determination to deny an application is final. (F) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an applicant who has previously participated in the universal regulatory sandbox from doing so again with a different offering. Sec. 1357.07. (A)(1) Subject to division (B) of section 1357.06 of the Revised Code, upon receiving a recommendation to approve an application from the universal regulatory sandbox program advisory committee, the regulatory relief division, in consultation with the governor, may enter into a written agreement with the applicant admitting the applicant to the universal regulatory sandbox and describing the specific laws and regulations that are waived or suspended as part of the applicant's participation therein. (2) The sandbox participant may demonstrate the offering described in the sandbox participant's application, as described in the agreement, for twenty-four months following the date the agreement is entered. (3) An agreement under this section that waives or suspends a law or regulation does so only with respect to consumers who are residents of this state. (4) An agreement under this section does not restrict a sandbox participant that holds a license or other authorization in another state or jurisdiction from acting in accordance with that license or other authorization. (B) The regulatory relief division shall not enter into a written agreement with an applicant that waives or suspends either of the following: (1) Any tax levied by this state or a taxing authority of this state, as defined in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code; (2) A law or regulation that allows a consumer to seek restitution in the event that the consumer is harmed. (C) A sandbox participant is deemed to possess an appropriate license or other authorization under the laws of this state for the purposes of any provision of federal law requiring licensure or other authorization by the state. (D) Subject to division (E) of this section, all of the following apply: (1) During the demonstration period, a sandbox participant is not subject to the enforcement of state laws or regulations waived or suspended pursuant to the written agreement between the regulatory relief division and the sandbox participant. (2) A prosecutor shall not file or pursue charges pertaining to a law or regulation waived or suspended pursuant to that agreement that occurs during the demonstration period. (3) A state agency shall not file or pursue any punitive action against a sandbox participant, including a fine or license suspension or revocation, for the violation of a law or regulation waived or suspended pursuant to that agreement that occurs during the demonstration period. (E) A sandbox participant does not have immunity related to any criminal offense committed during the sandbox participant's participation in the universal regulatory sandbox. (F) By written notice, the regulatory relief division may end a sandbox participant's participation in the universal regulatory sandbox at any time and for any reason, including if the division, the common sense initiative office, or the governor determines that a sandbox participant is not operating in good faith to bring an innovative offering to market. (G) Neither the regulatory relief division nor its employees are liable for any business losses or the recouping of application expenses or other expenses related to the regulatory sandbox, including either of the following: (1) Denying an applicant's application to participate in the universal regulatory sandbox for any reason; (2) Ending a sandbox participant's participation in the regulatory sandbox at any time and for any reason. Sec. 1357.08. (A) Before demonstrating an offering to a consumer, a sandbox participant shall disclose all of the following to the consumer: (1) The name and contact information of the sandbox participant; (2) That the offering is authorized pursuant to the universal regulatory sandbox and, if applicable, that the sandbox participant does not have a license or other authorization to provide an offering under state laws that regulate offerings outside of the universal regulatory sandbox; (3) That the offering is undergoing testing and may not function as intended and may expose the consumer to certain risks as identified by the applicable agency's written report; (4) That the provider of the offering is not immune from civil liability for any losses or damages caused by the offering; (5) That the provider of the offering is not immune from criminal prosecution for violations of state law or regulations that are not suspended or waived as allowed by the universal regulatory sandbox; (6) That the offering is a temporary demonstration that may be discounted at the end of the demonstration period; (7) The expected end date of the demonstration period; (8) That a consumer may contact the regulatory relief division and file a complaint regarding the offering being demonstrated and provide the regulatory relief division's telephone number and web site address where a complaint may be filed. (B) The disclosures required by division (A) of this section shall be provided to a consumer in a clear and conspicuous form and, for an internet or application-based offering, a consumer shall acknowledge receipt of the disclosure before any transaction may be completed. (C) The regulatory relief division may require that a sandbox participant make additional disclosures to a consumer. Sec. 1357.09. (A) At least thirty days before the end of the demonstration period, a sandbox participant shall either seek an extension in accordance with section 1357.10 of the Revised Code or notify the regulatory relief division that the sandbox participant will exit the regulatory sandbox and discontinue the sandbox participant's demonstration after the day on which the demonstration period ends. (B) Subject to division (C) of this section, if the regulatory relief division does not receive the notification required by division (A) of this section, the regulatory sandbox demonstration period ends twenty-four months following the date the agreement described under section 1357.07 of the Revised Code is entered. (C) If a demonstration includes an offering that requires ongoing duties, the sandbox participant shall continue to fulfill those duties after the regulatory sandbox demonstration period ends. Sec. 1357.10. A sandbox participant may request an extension of the universal regulatory sandbox demonstration period not later than thirty days before the end of that period. The regulatory relief division shall grant or deny a request for an extension before the end of the demonstration period. If the regulatory relief division grants the request, the division shall specify the duration of the extension, which shall not be more than twelve months after the date the regulatory sandbox demonstration period would have otherwise ended. The regulatory relief division shall not approve more than five extensions, each having a duration of not more than twelve months, for the same sandbox participant respecting the same demonstration. Sec. 1357.11. (A) A sandbox participant shall retain records, documents, and data produced in the ordinary course of business regarding an offering demonstrated in the universal regulatory sandbox. (B) If a sandbox participant ceases to provide an offering before the end of a demonstration period, the sandbox participant shall notify the regulatory relief division and each applicable agency and report on actions taken by the sandbox participant to ensure consumers have not been harmed as a result. The regulatory relief division shall establish quarterly reporting requirements for a sandbox participant, including information about any consumer complaints. (C) The regulatory relief division may request records, documents, and data from a sandbox participant and, upon the regulatory relief division's request, the sandbox participant shall make such records, documents, and data available for inspection by the regulatory relief division. (D) The sandbox participant shall notify the regulatory relief division and each applicable agency of any incidents that result in harm to the health, safety, or financial well-being of a consumer. If a sandbox participant fails to notify the regulatory relief division and each applicable agency of any incidents as described in division (D)(1) of this section, or the regulatory relief division or an applicable agency has evidence that significant harm to a consumer has occurred, the regulatory relief division may immediately remove the sandbox participant from the universal regulatory sandbox. (E) Not later than thirty days after the date on which a sandbox participant exits the regulatory sandbox, the sandbox participant shall submit a written report to the regulatory relief division and each applicable agency describing the sandbox participant's demonstration, including all of the following: (1) Any incidents of harm to consumers; (2) Any legal action filed against the sandbox participant as a result of the participant's demonstration; (3) Any complaints filed with an applicable agency as a result of the sandbox participant's demonstration. (F) Not later than thirty days after the date on which an applicable agency receives a quarterly reporting or written report from a sandbox participant as required by this section, the applicable agency shall provide a written report to the regulatory relief division on the demonstration that describes any statutory or regulatory reform the applicable agency recommends as a result of the demonstration. (G) The regulatory relief division may remove a sandbox participant from the universal regulatory sandbox at any time if the regulatory relief division determines that a sandbox participant has engaged in, is engaging in, or is about to engage in any practice or transaction that is in violation of this chapter or that constitutes a violation of a law or regulation for which suspension or waiver has not been granted. Sec. 1357.12. (A) The regulatory relief division shall create and maintain a publicly accessible page on the common sense initiative office's web site that invites residents and businesses in this state to make suggestions regarding laws and regulations that could be modified or eliminated to reduce the regulatory burden of residents and businesses in the state. (B) On at least a quarterly basis, the regulatory relief division shall compile the results of suggestions from the web page and provide a written report to the governor and the general assembly, in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code, that describes the most common suggestions. (C) In creating the report, the regulatory relief division and the advisory committee shall ensure that private information of residents and businesses that make suggestions on the web page is not made public. The regulatory relief division may evaluate the suggestions and provide analysis and suggestions regarding which state laws and regulations could be modified or eliminated to reduce the regulatory burden of residents and businesses in the state while still protecting consumers.